Hawaii statutes.
§143-10 Stray dogs. Every person who
takes into the person's possession any stray dog shall immediately notify the
animal control officer and release the dog to the animal control officer upon
demand. If there is attached to the dog a license tag for the then current
year, the animal control officer shall notify in writing the person to whom the
license was issued, at the address given in the license certificate, and, upon
demand made within twenty-four hours thereafter and without charge, shall release
the dog to the person. If no person lawfully entitled to the dog, within nine
days after the date of giving the notice, shall claim the dog, the dog may be
sold or destroyed by the animal control officer in the manner provided in
section 143-8 for unlicensed dogs. [L 1941, c 268, §9; RL 1945, §7159; RL 1955,
§156-10; HRS §143-10; am L 1983, c 227, §7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next